Washington statutes.
RCW 26.33.270

Decree of adoption—Protection of certain rights and benefits.

An order or decree entered under this chapter shall not disentitle a child to any benefit due the child from any third person, agency, state, or the United States. Action under this chapter shall not affect any rights and benefits that a native American child derives from the child's descent from a member of an Indian tribe or band.

[ 1984 c 155 s 27.]